Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0787.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11. (1) (a) A marihuana establishment may shall not allow cultivation, processing, sale, take any of the following actions: (a) Cultivate, process, sell, or display of marihuana or sell or display marihuana accessories to be if the cultivating, processing, selling, or displaying is visible from a public place outside of the marihuana establishment without the use of binoculars, aircraft, or other optical aids. (b) A marihuana establishment may not cultivate, Cultivate, process, test, or store marihuana at any a location other than a physical address approved by the department and within an enclosed area that is secured in a manner that prevents access by persons not permitted by the marihuana establishment to access the area.cannabis regulatory agency. (c) Allow an individual who is younger than 21 years of age to volunteer or work for the marihuana establishment. (d) Sell or otherwise transfer marihuana that was not produced, distributed, and taxed in compliance with this act. (e) Sell or otherwise transfer a marihuana accessory that has a heating element and is intended or designed to introduce marihuana into the human body unless the heating element is made of or encased in 1 or both of the following materials: (i) Glass. (ii) Ceramic. (f) Sell or otherwise transfer tobacco. (2) (c) A marihuana establishment shall secure comply with all of the following requirements: (a) Cultivate, process, test, and store marihuana within an enclosed area that is secured in a manner that prevents access by persons not allowed by the marihuana establishment to access the area. (b) Secure every entrance to the marihuana establishment so that access to areas containing marihuana is restricted to employees only the following persons: (i) Employees and other persons permitted allowed by the marihuana establishment to access the area. and to agents (ii) Agents of the department or state cannabis regulatory agency. (iii) State and local law enforcement officers and emergency personnel. and shall secure its (c) Secure the marihuana establishment's inventory and equipment during and after operating hours the marihuana establishment's hours of operation to deter and prevent theft of marihuana and marihuana accessories. (d) No marihuana establishment may refuse representatives Allow agents of the department the right cannabis regulatory agency during the marihuana establishment's hours of operation to inspect the licensed premises or to audit the marihuana establishment's books and records. of the marihuana establishment. (e) No marihuana establishment may allow a person under 21 years of age to volunteer or work for the marihuana establishment. (f) No marihuana establishment may sell or otherwise transfer marihuana that was not produced, distributed, and taxed in compliance with this act. (3) (g) A marihuana grower, marihuana retailer, marihuana processor, marihuana microbusiness, or marihuana testing safety compliance facility or agents acting on their behalf may its agent shall not transport more than 15 ounces of marihuana or more than 60 grams of marihuana concentrate at one 1 time. (4) (h) A marihuana secure transporter may shall not hold title to marihuana. (5) (i) No A marihuana processor may shall not process and no a marihuana retailer may shall not sell edible marihuana-infused candy in shapes or packages that are attractive to children or that are easily confused with commercially sold candy that does not contain marihuana. (6) (j) No A marihuana retailer may shall not sell or otherwise transfer marihuana that unless the marihuana is not contained in an opaque, resealable, child-resistant package designed to be significantly difficult for children under a child younger than 5 years of age to open and not difficult for a normal adults adult to use properly as defined by 16 C.F.R. 1700.20 (1995), unless the marihuana provided for under 16 CFR 1700.20. This subsection does not apply to marihuana that is transferred for consumption on the premises where the marihuana is sold. (k) No marihuana establishment may sell or otherwise transfer tobacco.